New Jersey, session 222, A2359.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.   As used in this act: Degree plan means a statement of the course of study requirements that an undergraduate student enrolled in an institution of higher education or a proprietary institution must complete to graduate from the institution. Proprietary institution means a proprietary institution licensed to offer academic degrees. b.    Except as otherwise provided in subsection c. of this section, an undergraduate student enrolled in a four-year institution of higher education shall file a degree plan with the institution as soon as practicable, but not later than by the completion of 60 credit hours of course work. c.     A four-year institution of higher education shall develop a process for undergraduate students who transfer to the institution with at least 45 credit hours of course work to develop and file a degree plan with the institution during the students second semester at the institution. d.    A degree-seeking undergraduate student enrolled in a county college or proprietary institution shall file a degree plan with the institution as soon as practicable, but not later than by the completion of 30 credit hours of course work. e.     An institution of higher education or proprietary institution shall provide notice to a student who selects a new academic major or minor, or who experiences such other change in circumstance as defined by the institution, that the student shall file a revised degree plan with the institution as soon as practicable. f.     A degree plan filed pursuant to this section shall: (1)   be developed in consultation with an appropriate academic official in the students degree program, or if an appropriate academic official is not available in the students degree program, an appropriate academic official at the institution; and (2)   follow a pathway to a degree as required pursuant to section 2 of this act to the extent practicable. 2.    a.   An institution of higher education or a proprietary institution shall: (1)   develop a pathway system whereby the institution establishes graduation progress benchmarks for each academic major and for the general education program for students who have not declared a major; (2)   require the pathway for each first-time degree-seeking student to include credit-bearing mathematics and English courses that are applicable towards degree requirements in the first 24 credit hours of course work completed at the institution of higher education or proprietary institution; and (3)   require the pathway for each degree-seeking student enrolled in a remedial course in mathematics, reading, or English to include the credit-bearing course in mathematics, reading, or English concurrent with or in the semester immediately following completion of the remedial course. b.    (1)   The graduation progress benchmarks established pursuant to paragraph (1) of subsection a. of this section shall specify the credit and course criteria that indicate satisfactory progress toward a degree. (2)   The academic departments of an institution of higher education or a proprietary institution shall establish schedules for regular periodic reviews of student progress. (3)   A student who is in danger of falling behind the graduation progress benchmarks shall be required to consult with an appropriate academic official. 3.    This act shall take effect immediately and shall first be applicable to the first class of students entering an institution of higher education or proprietary institution following the effective date of this act.